Utah statutes.
70A-8-302.    Rights of purchaser.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsections (2) and (3), a purchaser of a certificated or uncertificated security acquires all rights in the security that the transferor had or had power to transfer.

(2)  A purchaser of a limited interest acquires rights only to the extent of the interest purchased.

(3)  A purchaser of a certificated security who as a previous holder had notice of an adverse claim does not improve its position by taking from a protected purchaser.

